Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 2. PARKS AND WILDLIFE DEPARTMENT

CHAPTER 13. POWERS AND DUTIES CONCERNING PARKS AND OTHER RECREATIONAL AREAS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 13.001. CONTROL BY DEPARTMENT. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the following are under the department's control and custody:

(1) all recreational and natural areas designated as state parks; and

(2) all historical sites under the jurisdiction of the department.

(b) The commission shall establish a classification system for state parks and wildlife management areas that categorizes wildlife management areas, parks, or a portion of parks as wildlife management areas, recreational areas, natural areas, or historical sites. The commission may not classify a historical site as a historical park.

(c) The commission shall adopt rules governing the acquisition and development of recreational areas, natural areas, or historical sites.

(d) The commission shall establish as a priority the acquisition of land necessary for parks that are established by this code and that comply with the classification system and rules adopted by the commission as required by this section.

(e) The commission shall have the exclusive authority to determine sound biological management practices for all lands under its control.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 217, Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1245 (S.B. 1518), Sec. 8, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 13.002. DEVELOPMENT AND ACQUISITION OF OUTDOOR AREAS. The department may:

(1) develop, operate, and maintain outdoor areas and facilities of the state; and

(2) acquire land, water, and interests in land and water for outdoor recreation areas and facilities.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 13.003. GIFTS AND IMPROVEMENTS OF PARK SITES. The department may receive gifts of state park sites and may improve and equip parks sites or contract for their improvement and equipment.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.004. FINANCING OF PARK PROGRAMS. (a) Except as provided by Section 13.0045, the operation, maintenance, and improvement of state parks shall be financed from the general revenue fund, the state parks account, other accounts that may be authorized by law, and donations, grants, and gifts received by the department for these purposes.

(b) No donation, grant, or gift accruing to the state or received by the department for the purpose of operating, maintaining, improving, or developing state parks may be used for any purpose other than the operation, maintenance, or developing of state parks.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 902, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 13.0041. USE OF CERTAIN BOND REVENUE. The department shall, if practicable, apportion at least fifteen percent of any money received by the department from the proceeds of the sale of bonds issued under Section 50-f, Article III, Texas Constitution, to specific park maintenance or improvement projects for which matching private or local money for the specific state parks and wildlife projects has been made available to the department.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 33(a), eff. Nov. 6, 2001.

Sec. 13.0044. PREFERENCE FOR CERTAIN PARK PROGRAMS. In selecting parks for capital improvements, the department may give a preference to programs in which the department matches locally raised money on a dollar-for-dollar basis.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 21, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 13.0045. REVENUE BONDS FOR PARKS AND WILDLIFE FACILITIES. (a) The department, by resolution of the commission, may request the Texas Public Finance Authority to issue revenue bonds or other revenue obligations to finance the repair, renovation, improvement, and equipping of parks and wildlife facilities for an estimated project cost not to exceed $60 million.

(b) On receipt of the department's request, the authority shall promptly issue the bonds or other obligations under and in accordance with Chapter 1232, Government Code.

(c) The department shall deposit the proceeds of bonds issued under this section to the credit of the Texas parks and wildlife capital account and may use the proceeds only to finance the repair, renovation, improvement, and equipping of parks and wildlife facilities.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 902, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.362, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 13.0046. COOPERATION WITH INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(b) The commission may enter into a joint agreement with the governing board of an institution of higher education to finance and build a conference center and other appropriate related facilities to be located in or near a state park.

(c) A facility built under this section must be operated cooperatively to provide benefits to the department and the institution of higher education in accomplishing the purposes of the department and the institution.

(d) The commission and an institution of higher education may use any funds, property, or other assets available to finance and build a facility under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (H.B. 3842), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 13.005. ACQUISITION OF HISTORICAL SITES. (a) The department may acquire by purchase, gift, or other manner historical sites:

(1) where events occurred that represent an important aspect of the cultural, political, economic, military, or social history of the nation or state;

(2) significantly associated with the lives of outstanding historic persons or with an important event that represents a great ideal or idea;

(3) embodying the distinguishing characteristics of an architectural type which is inherently valuable for study of a period, style, or method of construction;

(4) that contributes significantly to the understanding of aboriginal man in the nation or state; or

(5) that is of significant geologic interest relating to prehistoric animal or plant life.

(b) The department shall restore and maintain each historical site acquired under this section for the benefit of the general public. The department may enter into interagency contracts for this purpose.

(c) The department shall formulate plans for the preservation and development of historical sites. Before formulating a plan for a specific site, the department shall conduct an archeological survey of the site. In formulating plans, the department shall:

(1) consider the results from the archeological survey for the site if the plan is for a specific site;

(2) consider the resources necessary to manage a site; and

(3) meet with and consider comments made by the Texas Historical Commission.

(d) The department and the Texas Historical Commission shall form a joint panel to establish criteria for determining whether a site is of statewide significance under Subsection (a) and to promote the continuity of a historic sites program.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 38, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 13.0051. COORDINATION WITH TEXAS HISTORICAL COMMISSION; REPORT ON PRESERVATION PLANS. The department shall meet regularly with the Texas Historical Commission regarding plans to preserve and develop historical sites in this state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 13.0052. REPORTS. The department shall periodically prepare reports on plans to preserve and develop historical sites under the jurisdiction of the department in this state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1245 (S.B. 1518), Sec. 9, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 13.0053. REFERENCE TO HISTORICAL SITES. (a) In this section, "publication" includes the publication of a book, magazine, photograph, poster, or bulletin.

(b) The department may not refer to a historical site as a "historical park":

(1) in a department publication; or

(2) on a department marker or sign.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 13.006. LEASE OF LANDS. (a) The department may lease any land and improvements it holds to a city, county, special district, nonprofit organization, or political subdivision. The leased area may not be referred to as a state facility, and no state funds may be used to operate or maintain a property leased under this section.

(b) The conditions and duration of the lease agreement are determined by the agreement of the department and the lessee.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 617, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 13.0061. LEASE OF GRAZING RIGHTS ON PARK LANDS; SALE OF PRODUCTS. (a) The department may lease grazing rights on any state park or any area of a state park. The department may harvest and sell, or sell in place, any timber, hay, livestock, or other product grown on state park land the department finds to be in excess of natural resource management, educational, or interpretive objectives. Timber may be harvested only for forest pest management, salvage, or habitat restoration and under good forestry practices with the advice of the Texas Forest Service.

(b) The department may agree to accept materials, supplies, or services instead of money as part or full payment for a sale or lease under this section. The department may not assign to the materials, supplies, or services accepted as payment under this subsection a value that exceeds their actual market value.

(c) Except for consideration accepted under Subsection (b) of this section, all revenue derived from a lease or sale under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the state parks account.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2697, ch. 734, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1981. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 447, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 22, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 13.007. INVESTIGATION EXPENSES. A locality may pay the expenses of a representative of the department for a trip to the locality to determine the suitability of a site for a state park. If the expenses of the representative are paid by the locality, state funds may not be used for the expenses of the trip.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.0075. ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR INCLUSION OF REAL PROPERTY IN STATE PARKS SYSTEM. (a) The commission by rule shall adopt criteria for determining the eligibility of real property that is donated to the department for inclusion in the state parks system.

(b) The department may accept a donation of real property that satisfies the criteria adopted under Subsection (a).

(c) The department may renovate or restore donated real property, including improvements to the property, or construct new improvements on the donated real property as necessary and prudent.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 23, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 13.008. SOLICITATION, RECEIPT, AND TRANSFER OF LAND. (a) The department may solicit and receive donations of land for public purposes and may refuse donations of land not acceptable for public purposes.

(b) If title to a site has vested in the department and if ownership of the site is no longer in the best interest of the department, the department may transfer the title:

(1) to another state department or institution requesting the site;

(2) to the donor of the land if the donor requests the return of the site;

(3) to the United States if it has undertaken the development of the site for public purposes;

(4) to the grantor if the deed to the department contains a reversion clause providing that title reverts to the grantor when the site is not used for the purposes for which it was acquired; or

(5) to any legally authorized entity if the property is to be used for public purposes.

(c) A two-thirds vote of the commission is necessary for action taken under this section.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 617, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 13.009. SALE OR EXCHANGE OF LAND. (a) The director with the approval of the commission may execute a deed exchanging real property or an interest in real property either as all or partial consideration for other real property or interest in real property. The director with the approval of the commission may execute a deed selling real property or an interest in real property under the jurisdiction of the department if ownership of the real property is no longer in the best interest of the department.

(b) The department shall receive a good and marketable title to all land exchanged under this section.

(c) All land to be received in the exchange must be appraised and if the land to be received is of greater value, as determined by an independent and competent appraisal, than the state land exchanged, the department may use funds available for land acquisitions as a partial consideration for the exchange.

(d) The receipts from the sale of land under this section shall be used for improving or acquiring other real property dedicated to the same purpose for which the land sold was dedicated.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law or charter provision to the contrary, the department and a municipality may agree to exchange park properties under the control or management of the department or municipal government on the following conditions:

(1) the properties to be exchanged shall continue to be dedicated park properties and used for park purposes;

(2) no election is required by the municipality to authorize the exchange; and

(3) all of the provisions of Subsections (a) through (d) of this section are complied with by the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 609, ch. 220, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1977; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 550, ch. 260, art. 3, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1979; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1069, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 246, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 617, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 13.010. HISTORIC SITES. The department and the Texas Historical Commission may cooperate to locate, designate, and suitably mark historic grounds, battlefields, and other historic spots in Texas as historic sites. Fitting markers may be erected; however, no expense may be incurred in the name of the state for this project.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1245 (S.B. 1518), Sec. 10, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 13.011. NATURAL FEATURES. (a) The commission may locate and designate outstanding natural features and formations located in this state. It may erect or contract to have erected suitable markers or monuments to call the features and formations to the public's attention.

(b) The commission may accept title to a suitable site for a marker or monument from private individuals, associations, or corporations by gift. Sites may also be acquired by purchase with appropriated funds.

(c) The commission may adopt reasonable rules for accepting or purchasing sites, for determining the suitability of sites, and for establishing the priority of accepting and marking the sites.

(d) All other agencies shall cooperate with the department to aid in the location of sites. The department may accept jurisdiction over suitable sites located on state land by an interagency transfer of jurisdiction.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.012. ROADSIDE PARKS. An area under the control of the department which is more suitable for use as a roadside park than any other type of park may be transferred to the Texas Department of Transportation for roadside park purposes if the land meets the specifications of the Texas Department of Transportation.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 22(61), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 13.013. CONSTRUCTION OF ROADS BY TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION. (a) The department may contract with the Texas Transportation Commission for the construction and paving of roads in and adjacent to state parks.

(b) Agreements under this section must be made in conformity with the Interagency Cooperation Act.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 22(62), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 13.014. ROADS AND TRAILS TO CERTAIN PARK SITES. (a) The department shall acquire, construct, and maintain roads and trails from public roads to park sites located on and accessible to the waters of Buchanan and Inks lakes in Burnet, Lampasas, Llano, San Saba, Travis, and Williamson counties. The park sites may be state parks or land owned by the Lower Colorado River Authority dedicated to public use for park purposes.

(b) The department may acquire the rights-of-way for the roads and trails by purchase or gift or by exercise of the power of eminent domain.

(c) The Texas Transportation Commission shall cooperate with the department, and the department shall cooperate and match funds with any state or federal governmental agency and shall sponsor any state or federal project.

(d) The department may make contracts to carry out the provisions of this section.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 22(63), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 13.0145. SPEED LIMITS. (a) The department shall set and enforce speed limits on a road in a state park, wildlife management area, or other site under the control of the department as follows:

(1) 30 miles per hour on a park road or main drive;

(2) 20 miles per hour on a secondary road; or

(3) as posted by the department.

(b) The department shall:

(1) consult with the Texas Department of Transportation to determine if a speed limit under Subsection (a) is reasonable and safe based on an engineering and traffic control study; and

(2) amend the limit, if necessary.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 24, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 13.015. PARK USER FEES; CONCESSIONS. (a) The department may charge and collect park user fees for park services. The user fees shall be set by the commission.

(a-1) The commission may waive the park entrance fee for a person who is at least 70 years of age, a student enrolled in the fifth grade, or a child who is 11 years of age. The commission may not waive the fee for use of a park facility, including a hook-up fee for electricity or water.

(a-2) The department may promote visits and enhance revenue at parks, including amounts necessary for salaries, advertising, consumable supplies and materials, promotional products, fees, and related expenses.

(b) The department may operate or grant contracts to operate concessions in state parks or on causeways, beach drives, or other improvements in connection with state park sites. The department may make regulations governing the granting or operating of concessions. The department may establish and operate staff concessions, including salaries, consumable supplies and materials, operating expenses, rental and other equipment, and other capital outlays.

(b-1) The department may purchase products, including food items, for resale or rental at a profit.

(b-2) The department shall operate any resale concession program using standard business practice models to generate revenue and provide quality customer service while adhering to conservation principles.

(b-3) The department may recruit and select private service providers to enter into leased concession contracts with the department to provide necessary and appropriate visitor services.

(c) The department shall deposit any revenue received from the contracts, user fees, or operations authorized by this section in the state treasury to the credit of the state parks account.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 25, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1097 (H.B. 2065), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 13.0151. STATE PARK PASSES. (a) The department may contract with any entity the department considers appropriate to sell state park passes in any of the entity's retail locations.

(b) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 13.0155. USE OF PARKS AND WILDLIFE DEPARTMENT BRAND. (a) The department may contract with any entity the department considers appropriate to use the Parks and Wildlife Department brand in exchange for licensing fees paid by the entity to the department.

(b) The department may use the licensing fees received under Subsection (a) for any use under this code.

(c) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 13.016. INMATE LABOR. (a) The department may use the labor of an inmate confined in a state, county, or local correctional facility on or in connection with state parks, wildlife management areas, or other property under the control or jurisdiction of the department.

(b) Inmates working in connection with lands under the control or jurisdiction of the department remain under the control of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice or county or local correctional facility, as appropriate, and are considered as serving their terms in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice or other correctional facility.

(c) The department may purchase equipment, meals, supplies, and materials for an inmate working at a department site as necessary to facilitate the use of the labor described by this section.

(d) The department may not use the labor of an inmate convicted of an offense listed in Article 62.001(5), Code of Criminal Procedure.

(e) The department may not use the labor of an inmate convicted of any violent offense.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 26, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 13.017. PUBLICATIONS ON PARKS. (a) The department may provide or sell information, including books, magazines, photographs, prints, and bulletins, to the public on state parks.

(b) The department may enter into contractual agreements for publication of information concerning state parks.

(c) The department may receive royalties on department-owned materials that are sold or supplied to others by the department for publication.

(d) Money received under this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the account from which expenses for the publication were paid.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 13.018. STATE PARKLANDS PASSPORT. (a) The following people may apply to the department for a state parklands passport:

(1) a resident of this state who is 65 years old or over who has resided in the state for six consecutive months preceding the date of application for a parklands passport or any other individual in a category that the commission by rule designates as a resident of this state who is 65 years old or over;

(2) an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed services;

(3) a member of the United States armed services on active duty;

(4) a surviving spouse, parent, child, or sibling of a person who died while serving in the United States armed forces; and

(5) an individual who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of the major life activities of the individual.

(b) The department shall issue a passport to each qualified applicant. The passport shall be issued on a form designed and provided by the department.

(c) The holder of a state parklands passport issued on or before August 31, 1995, a person whose birth date is before September 1, 1930, or a person described by Subsection (a)(2), (3), or (4) is entitled to enter any state park without payment of an entrance or admission fee. When a fee is charged by the department for entrance of a vehicle into a state park, the vehicle of the holder of a state parklands passport is exempt from the fee when the holder is present.

(d) The department may discount or waive a park entrance fee for a resident of this state issued an initial state parklands passport after August 31, 1995. When a fee is charged by the department for entrance of a vehicle into a state park, the vehicle of the holder of an initial state parklands passport may enter any state park on payment of a lower vehicle entrance fee. The department may waive vehicle entrance fees for any state park for the holder of an initial state parklands passport.

(e) A state parklands passport issued to a person described by Subsection (a)(3) is valid for one year from the date of issuance and may be renewed in the manner prescribed by commission rule.

(f) The commission by rule shall establish eligibility requirements and privileges available to the holder of a state parklands passport described by Subsection (a)(5).

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 36, ch. 19, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 629, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 387, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 227 (H.B. 1740), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 13.019. FACILITY RESERVATION SYSTEM AND FEE. (a) The department may permit the advance reservation of a facility, lodging, or campsite at a state park and require the payment of a fee by a person making the reservation.

(b) The department shall annually:

(1) evaluate whether the reservation system used by the department for the advance reservation of facilities, lodging, and campsites is as user-friendly as possible; and

(2) make modifications to the system as necessary to enhance the user-friendliness of the reservation system.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1065, ch. 495, Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 1979. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 27, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 13.0191. FACILITY AND LODGING FEES. A fee charged by the department under this subchapter for the use of a facility or lodging at a state park may vary on a seasonal basis and may be set in an amount to recover the direct and indirect costs of providing the facility or lodging and provide a reasonable rate of return to the department. Items to be considered in setting a fee include the cost required to provide, maintain, and improve amenities available at the site and seasonal variables such as the cost of staffing to meet demand and costs of heating or air conditioning.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 28, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 13.020. LOCAL PUBLIC HEARINGS ON PARK DEVELOPMENT PLANS. Before the commission approves a park master development plan, the department must hold a public hearing to receive comments on the plan in an area near the location of the new park site.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 42, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 13.022. EASEMENT THROUGH CADDO LAKE STATE PARK. The department shall grant an easement through Caddo Lake State Park to provide access to private real property located within the park.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 392, Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 1985. Renumbered from Sec. 13.020 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(34), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 13.023. LIFEGUARDS AND SIGNAGE IN CERTAIN AREAS. (a) The department shall:

(1) during reasonable daylight hours, as established and posted by the department, from Memorial Day to Labor Day, provide:

(A) occupied lifeguard towers or mobile lifeguard units on each side of each pier, jetty, or other structure that protrudes into the Gulf of Mexico that is located within a state park; or

(B) a single occupied lifeguard tower or mobile lifeguard unit at each pier, jetty, or other structure that protrudes into the Gulf of Mexico that is located within a state park if the single tower provides an unobstructed view of both sides of each structure; and

(2) post within 100 yards of each side of each structure described by Subdivision (1) signs clearly describing the dangerous water conditions that may occur near the structure.

(b) The department may suspend or alter the duties imposed under Subsection (a) during dangerous weather conditions or emergency operations.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 724 (H.B. 3807), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. REGULATIONS GOVERNING PARKS AND OTHER RECREATIONAL AREAS

Sec. 13.101. AUTHORIZATION. The commission may promulgate regulations governing the health, safety, and protection of persons and property in state parks, historic sites, scientific areas, or forts under the control of the department, including public water within state parks, historic sites, scientific areas, and forts.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1206, ch. 456, Sec. 4(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.102. SCOPE OF REGULATIONS. The regulations may govern:

(1) the conservation, preservation, and use of state property whether natural features or constructed facilities;

(2) the abusive, disruptive, or destructive conduct of persons;

(3) the activities of park users including camping, swimming, boating, fishing, or other recreational activities;

(4) the possession of pets or animals;

(5) the regulation of traffic and parking; and

(6) conduct which endangers the health or safety of park users or their property.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2725, ch. 741, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1982.

Sec. 13.103. ADVERTISING. The commission by rule shall prohibit inappropriate commercial advertising in state parks, natural areas, historic sites, or other sites under the jurisdiction of the department to preserve the integrity of the sites and to minimize distractions that may interfere with the enjoyment of the sites by visitors.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 3, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 13.106. POSTING OF REGULATIONS. All specific or general regulations applying to a state park, historic site, scientific area, or fort must be posted in a conspicuous place at the park, site, or fort. A copy of the regulations shall be made available on request to persons using the park.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.108. REMOVAL FROM PARK. (a) Any person directly or indirectly responsible for disruptive, destructive, or violent conduct which endangers property or the health, safety, or lives of persons or animals may be removed from a park, historic site, scientific area, or fort for a period not to exceed 48 hours.

(b) Prior to removal under this section, the person must be given notice of the provisions of this section and an opportunity to correct the conduct justifying removal.

(c) A court of competent jurisdiction may enjoin a person from reentry to the park, scientific area, site, or fort, on cause shown, for any period set by the court.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.109. ENFORCEMENT OF REGULATIONS. Regulations adopted under this subchapter may be enforced by any peace officer, including those employees of the department commissioned as peace officers under Section 11.019 of this code. A notice to appear may be issued by a peace officer for violation of a regulation on a form prescribed by the commission.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.110. EFFECT OF REGULATIONS. No regulation adopted under this subchapter may amend or repeal any penal law of this state.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.112. PENALTY. A person who violates a regulation adopted under Subchapter B of this chapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER C. REGULATIONS GOVERNING AREAS ADJACENT TO STATE PARKS

Sec. 13.201. AUTHORIZATION. The commission may make regulations prohibiting the use of firearms or certain types of firearms on state property adjacent to state parks and within 200 yards of the boundary of the state park.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.202. APPLICATION LIMITED. The regulations of the commission under Section 13.201 of this code apply only to state parks located within one mile of coastal water of this state.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.205. PENALTY. A person who violates a regulation made by the commission under Section 13.201 of this code commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER D. PARTICIPATION IN FEDERAL PROGRAMS

Sec. 13.301. PROGRAMS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF HISTORIC SITES AND STRUCTURES. (a) The department may apply to any appropriate agency or officer of the United States for participation in or the receipt of aid from any federal program involving the planning, acquisition, and development of historic sites and structures.

(b) The department may contract with the United States or its agencies to plan, acquire, and develop historic sites and structures in this state in conformity with any federal act concerning the development of historic sites and structures.

(c) The department shall keep financial and other records relating to programs under this section and shall furnish appropriate officials and agencies of the United States and of this state all reports and information reasonably necessary for the administration of the programs.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.302. PROGRAMS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF OUTDOOR RECREATION RESOURCES. The department is the state agency to cooperate with the federal government in the administration of federal assistance programs for the planning, acquisition, operation, and development of the outdoor recreation resources of the state, including acquisition of land and water and interests in land and water. The department shall cooperate with the federal government in the administration of the provisions of the Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965 (Public Law 88-578).

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.303. COOPERATION WITH OTHER AGENCIES. (a) The department shall cooperate with departments of the federal government and other departments of state and local government, including as a part of the state plan, water districts, river authorities, and special districts in outdoor recreation. The department shall issue rules and regulations to cooperate in the enforcement and administration of federal acts and rules and regulations.

(b) The department shall implement programs and coordinate with departments and agencies of the federal government, including the United States Border Patrol and the Drug Enforcement Administration, and other departments of state and local government, if necessary, to minimize environmental damage to any land under the control and custody of the department along this state's border with Mexico.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 588, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 13.304. ADDITIONAL POWERS OF COUNTIES AND SPECIAL DISTRICTS. Counties, river authorities, water districts, and other political subdivisions organized under Article III, Section 52, or Article XVI, Section 59, of the Texas Constitution, may:

(1) acquire land for public recreation;

(2) construct facilities for public use on land acquired for public recreation;

(3) provide for the operation, maintenance, and supervision of the public recreation areas;

(4) execute agreements with other local, state, or federal agencies for planning, construction, maintenance, and operation of public recreation facilities and necessary access roads; and

(5) maintain adequate sanitary standards on the land and water areas that are part of or adjacent to public recreation areas.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.305. CONDEMNATION PROCEEDINGS. (a) The department may institute condemnation proceedings according to the laws of this state to acquire land for programs developing outdoor recreation resources under Section 13.302 of this code.

(b) Costs incurred in the exercise of eminent domain under this section for the relocation, raising, lowering, rerouting, or change in grade, or alteration in the construction of any electric transmission, telegraph, or telephone line, railroad, conduit, pole, property, facility, or pipeline are the sole expense of the department.

(c) "Sole expense" means the actual cost of the lowering, rerouting, or change in grade or alteration of construction in providing comparable replacement without enhancement of the facility, after deducting the net salvage value derived from the old facility.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.306. APPLICATION FOR PARTICIPATION IN FEDERAL PROGRAMS. (a) The department may apply to any appropriate agency or officer of the United States for participation in or the receipt of aid from any federal outdoor recreation program.

(b) The department may contract with the United States or any appropriate federal agency to plan, acquire, and develop outdoor recreation resources of the state in conformity with the Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965 or any other federal act to develop outdoor recreation resources of the state.

(c) The department shall keep financial and other records relating to the programs under this section and shall furnish to appropriate officials and agencies of the United States and of this state reports and information reasonably necessary for the administration of the programs.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.307. COORDINATION OF ACTIVITIES. To obtain the benefits of outdoor recreation programs under this subchapter, the department shall coordinate its activities with and represent the interests of all agencies and political subdivisions of the state as a part of a state plan. The state plan shall include cities, counties, water districts, river authorities, and special districts in outdoor recreation having interests in the planning, development, acquisition, operation, and maintenance of outdoor recreation resources and facilities.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.308. AVAILABILITY OF STATE FUNDS. (a) The department may not make a commitment or an agreement to participate in an outdoor recreation program under this subchapter until sufficient funds are available to meet the state's share of the cost of the project.

(b) An outdoor recreation area or facility acquired or developed by the department under this subchapter shall be publicly maintained to the extent necessary to insure its proper operation and maintenance.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.309. AVAILABILITY OF LOCAL FUNDS. The department may agree with the United States or any appropriate agency to plan, acquire, operate, and develop projects involving participating federal aid funds on behalf of any political subdivision of this state if the political subdivision certifies to the department that:

(1) sufficient funds are available to meet its share, if any, of the cost of the project; and

(2) the acquired or developed areas will be operated and maintained at the expense of the subdivision for public outdoor recreation use.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.310. RECEIPT AND EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS. (a) The department may receive and spend federal money allocated to the state for any project established to develop outdoor recreation resources under this subchapter and for administrative and other expenses incident to the administration of these projects.

(b) The department may receive and expend funds from the state, a county, a city, or any other source for the development of outdoor recreation resources under this subchapter.

(c) The department shall deposit all funds received for the development of outdoor recreation resources in the state treasury to the credit of the state land and water conservation account, the Texas recreation and parks account, the large county and municipality recreation and parks account, or the state parks account.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 13.311. PROJECT PRIORITY. The department may make rules and regulations governing the priority of projects submitted under an outdoor recreation plan under this subchapter and within the limitations of the appropriations made for these purposes.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.312. ADMINISTRATION EXPENSE. The department may employ necessary personnel, as determined by the director, and expend amounts necessary to administer efficiently the outdoor recreation programs under this subchapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.313. FISH AND WILDLIFE RESTORATION PROJECTS. The department may conduct and establish cooperative fish and wildlife restoration projects under the provisions of Public Law No. 415, Acts of the 75th Congress, and Public Law No. 681, Acts of the 81st Congress, as amended.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 13.314. COMPLIANCE IN FISHERY MANAGEMENT. The department may cooperate and contract with the Gulf of Mexico Fishery Management Council or the National Marine Fisheries Service for conduct of such work as may be necessary in complying with requirements of the Fishery Conservation and Management Act of 1976 (16 U.S.C.A. Section 1801 et seq.).

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1280, ch. 501, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1977.